District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.04

Comfort care bracelet or necklace.

(a)

EMS personnel shall recognize only a comfort care bracelet or necklace for purposes of withholding cardiopulmonary resuscitation or advanced life support.

(b)

The Mayor shall approve the design for a comfort care bracelet and necklace. The bracelet and necklace shall be easily identifiable and designed so that the following information is visible:

(1)

The patient’s name and an identification number;

(2)

The name and telephone number of the patient’s attending physician;

(3)

The comfort care order number; and

(4)

Any other information that the Mayor determines, by rule, to be necessary to implement this chapter.

(c)

The comfort care bracelet and necklace shall be metal, except that the Mayor may issue a plastic temporary bracelet and necklace for use by a patient until the metal bracelet or necklace is received.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 5, 48 DCR 27